prince/dictionaries/pt-BR.aff
SFX R N 117
SFX R   0       a      [aei]r
SFX R   0       am     [aei]r
SFX R   0       as     [aei]r
SFX R   0       des    [aei]r
SFX R   0       ei     [aei]r
SFX R   0       eis    [aei]r
SFX R   0       em     [aei]r
SFX R   0       emos   [aei]r
SFX R   0       es     [aei]r
SFX R   0       ia     [aei]r
SFX R   0       iam    [aei]r
SFX R   0       ias    [aei]r
SFX R   0       mos    [aei]r
SFX R   0       á      [aei]r
SFX R   0       ás     [aei]r
SFX R   0       ão     [aei]r
SFX R   0       íamos  [aei]r
SFX R   0       íeis   [aei]r
SFX R   ar      e      [^cgç]ar
SFX R   ar      ei     [^cgç]ar
SFX R   ar      eis    [^cgç]ar
SFX R   ar      em     [^cgç]ar
SFX R   ar      emos   [^cgç]ar
SFX R   ar      es     [^cgç]ar
SFX R   çar      ce      çar
SFX R   çar      cei     çar
SFX R   çar      ceis    çar
SFX R   çar      cem     çar
SFX R   çar      cemos   çar
SFX R   çar      ces     çar
SFX R   car     que    car
SFX R   car     quei   car
SFX R   car     queis  car
SFX R   car     quem   car
SFX R   car     quemos car
SFX R   car     ques   car
SFX R   ar      o      [^o]ar
SFX R   oar     ôo      oar
SFX R   ar      ou     ar
SFX R   ar      áramos  ar
SFX R   ar      áreis   ar
SFX R   ar      ásseis  ar
SFX R   ar      ássemos ar
SFX R   ar      ávamos  ar
SFX R   ar      áveis   ar
SFX R   er      a      [^cgu]er
SFX R   er      ais    [^cgu]er
SFX R   er      am     [^cgu]er
SFX R   er      amos   [^cgu]er
SFX R   er      as     [^cgu]er
SFX R   cer     ça     cer
SFX R   cer     çais   cer
SFX R   cer     çam    cer
SFX R   cer     çamos  cer
SFX R   cer     ças    cer
SFX R   ger     ja     ger
SFX R   ger     jais   ger
SFX R   ger     jam    ger
SFX R   ger     jamos  ger
SFX R   ger     jas    ger
SFX R   guer    ga     guer
SFX R   guer    gais   guer
SFX R   guer    gam    guer
SFX R   guer    gamos  guer
SFX R   guer    gas    guer
SFX R   er      i      er
SFX R   er      ia     er
SFX R   er      iam    er
SFX R   er      ias    er
SFX R   er      ido    er
SFX R   er      o      [^cgu]er
SFX R   ger     jo      ger
SFX R   guer    go      guer
SFX R   cer     ço      cer
SFX R   er      êramos  er
SFX R   er      êreis   er
SFX R   er      êsseis   er
SFX R   er      êssemos  er
SFX R   er      íamos    er
SFX R   er      íeis     er
SFX R   ir      a      ir
SFX R   ir      ais    ir
SFX R   ir      am     ir
SFX R   ir      amos   ir
SFX R   ir      as     ir
SFX R   ir      e      ir
SFX R   ir      em     ir
SFX R   ir      es     ir
SFX R   ir      o      ir
SFX R   ir      íamos  ir
SFX R   ir      íeis    ir
SFX R   ir      íramos  ir
SFX R   ir      íreis   ir
SFX R   ir      ísseis   ir
SFX R   ir      íssemos  ir
SFX R   r       0     [aei]r
SFX R   r       a      ir
SFX R   r       am      ir
SFX R   r       as      ir
SFX R   r       do      [ai]r
SFX R   r       i      [ae]r
SFX R   r       is     [ae]r
SFX R   r       m      [ae]r
SFX R   r       mos    [aei]r
SFX R   r       ndo    [aei]r
SFX R   r       s      [aei]r
SFX R   r       sse    [aei]r
SFX R   r       ssem   [aei]r
SFX R   r       sses   [aei]r
SFX R   r       ste    [aei]r
SFX R   r       stes   [aei]r
SFX R   r       u      [ei]r
SFX R   r       va      ar
SFX R   r       vam     ar
SFX R   r       vas     ar
SFX R   ar      á       ar
SFX R   er      ê       er


# IRREGULARES: estar, apoiar, saudar, passear, odiar, dar
#
#
#
