prince/dictionaries/pt-BR.dic
abalizar/R
abandonar/R
abastecer/R
abiscoitar/R
abobadar/R
abordar/R
abrandar/R
abrenhar/R
abrochar/R
acabar/R
acalorar/R
acarinhar/R
acastelar/R
aceitar/R
acercar/R
achar/R
acidular/R
aclamar/R
acobertar/R
acompanhar/R
acontecer/R
acorrer/R
acovardar/R
acrisolar/R
acutilar/R
adentrar/R
adiar/R
adjetivar/R
admitir/R
adoentar/R
adotar/R
adular/R
afagar/R
afeminar/R
aferventar/R
afiar/R
afincar/R
aflorar/R
afoitar/R
afugentar/R
agarrar/R
agigantar/R
aglomerar/R
agraciar/R
agregar/R
aguardar/R
ajardinar/R
ajuntar/R
alargar/R
alcançar/R
aleijar/R
alevantar/R
alicerçar/R
alijar/R
alisar/R
almoçar/R
alourar/R
alucinar/R
alvoroçar/R
amainar/R
amanhecer/R
amarelar/R
amasiar/R
amealhar/R
amerissar/R
amoitar/R
amontoar/R
amortizar/R
ampliar/R
anarquizar/R
anelar/R
angustiar/R
aniquilar/R
antedatar/R
apadrinhar/R
apanhar/R
aparelhar/R
apavorar/R
apelidar/R
apertar/R
apinhar/R
aplanar/R
apologizar/R
apossar/R
apreciar/R
apressar/R
aprontar/R
aprovisionar/R
apurar/R
aquilatar/R
arcar/R
aristocratizar/R
arpoar/R
arraigar/R
arrasar/R
arrebatar/R
arredar/R
arreganhar/R
arremedar/R
arrepiar/R
arrimar/R
arrogar/R
arrombar/R
articular/R
asilar/R
assanhar/R
assegurar/R
asseverar/R
assoar/R
assolar/R
assoviar/R
atalhar/R
ataviar/R
atenuar/R
atestar/R
atiçar/R
atracar/R
atravancar/R
atritar/R
atuar/R
aumentar/R
autenticar/R
autorizar/R
avaliar/R
avariar/R
avençar/R
aviltar/R
aviventar/R
avultar/R
azucrinar/R
açoitar/R
badalar/R
baixar/R
balizar/R
barbarizar/R
bastar/R
beatificar/R
beliscar/R
besuntar/R
bisbilhotar/R
blindar/R
bolar/R
borrar/R
bracejar/R
brigar/R
brocar/R
burilar/R
buzinar/R
cadastrar/R
caiar/R
calcificar/R
calhar/R
cambiar/R
cancelar/R
cantar/R
capengar/R
capotar/R
caracterizar/R
carimbar/R
castigar/R
catar/R
causar/R
cavoucar/R
cegar/R
censurar/R
centuplicar/R
cessar/R
chamar/R
chapinhar/R
cheirar/R
chocar/R
chupar/R
cientificar/R
cinzelar/R
circundar/R
citar/R
classificar/R
clinicar/R
coagular/R
cobiçar/R
cocoricar/R
colaborar/R
coletar/R
colocar/R
comemorar/R
comerciar/R
comissionar/R
comparar/R
compendiar/R
complementar/R
comprar/R
comungar/R
conceituar/R
conciliar/R
concursar/R
condimentar/R
confeitar/R
confidenciar/R
confiscar/R
confrontar/R
congratular/R
conjecturar/R
consagrar/R
considerar/R
consorciar/R
constatar/R
consubstanciar/R
contagiar/R
contemplar/R
continuar/R
contracenar/R
contrastar/R
conturbar/R
conversar/R
cooptar/R
corar/R
correlacionar/R
cortejar/R
cotejar/R
coçar/R
creditar/R
criar/R
cristianizar/R
cronometrar/R
culminar/R
cumprimentar/R
curar/R
cutucar/R
dardejar/R
debelar/R
debruçar/R
decantar/R
decifrar/R
decodificar/R
decotar/R
dedicar/R
defecar/R
deflagrar/R
defrontar/R
degolar/R
degustar/R
delatar/R
deliciar/R
demandar/R
demorar/R
densificar/R
depauperar/R
depilar/R
depravar/R
deputar/R
derribar/R
desabafar/R
desabotoar/R
desacorrentar/R
desafivelar/R
desagradar/R
desalinhar/R
desandar/R
desaparelhar/R
desapropriar/R
desarmar/R
desassossegar/R
desautorizar/R
desbravar/R
descambar/R
descarrilar/R
descer/R
descolorar/R
desconfiar/R
desconsiderar/R
descriminalizar/R
descuidar/R
desdobrar/R
desembarcar/R
desempacotar/R
desempilhar/R
desencorajar/R
desenferrujar/R
desenganchar/R
desengordurar/R
desenrolar/R
desentortar/R
desenvolver/R
desestimular/R
desfechar/R
desforrar/R
desgostar/R
desinchar/R
desintoxicar/R
deslocar/R
desmaiar/R
desmarcar/R
desmistificar/R
desmoronar/R
desnudar/R
desodorizar/R
desorientar/R
desparafusar/R
desperceber/R
despistar/R
desposar/R
desprezar/R
desregrar/R
destelhar/R
destoar/R
destronar/R
desvanecer/R
desvincular/R
deteriorar/R
detonar/R
dever/R
diagramar/R
dificultar/R
dignificar/R
dimensionar/R
direcionar/R
discorrer/R
disparar/R
disputar/R
dissipar/R
distorcer/R
divinizar/R
dizimar/R
dogmatizar/R
dominar/R
dotar/R
dragar/R
drogar/R
dulcificar/R
eclipsar/R
edificar/R
efeminar/R
ejetar/R
eletrizar/R
elogiar/R
emancipar/R
embaralhar/R
embarrancar/R
embaçar/R
embolar/R
emboscar/R
embrenhar/R
embrutecer/R
emocionar/R
empalar/R
empanturrar/R
empastelar/R
empepinar/R
empinar/R
emplumar/R
empolgar/R
empreitar/R
emudecer/R
enamorar/R
encafifar/R
encaminhar/R
encapsular/R
encarecer/R
encasular/R
encetar/R
enclausurar/R
encorpar/R
encrespar/R
encurvar/R
endividar/R
enegrecer/R
enfardar/R
enfeitar/R
enfezar/R
enfraquecer/R
enfurecer/R
engalanar/R
engarrafar/R
engatar/R
engendrar/R
engomar/R
engraçar/R
enjaular/R
enlatar/R
enojar/R
enredar/R
enrolar/R
ensaboar/R
ensejar/R
entabular/R
entender/R
entoar/R
entranhar/R
entrecruzar/R
entrevistar/R
entronizar/R
entusiasmar/R
envelhecer/R
envernizar/R
envilecer/R
enxotar/R
equilibrar/R
eqüidistar/R
errar/R
esboçar/R
esburacar/R
escalpelar/R
escanhoar/R
escarnecer/R
escoar/R
escorraçar/R
escravizar/R
esculhambar/R
esfacelar/R
esforcar/R
esganar/R
esguichar/R
esmerilhar/R
esmorecer/R
espalhar/R
espatifar/R
especular/R
espezinhar/R
espionar/R
esporar/R
espumar/R
esquecer/R
esquivar/R
estacionar/R
estalar/R
estatelar/R
esterilizar/R
estilizar/R
estipular/R
estornar/R
estralar/R
estrebuchar/R
estremecer/R
estribar/R
estudar/R
esturricar/R
esvoaçar/R
evangelizar/R
evocar/R
exaltar/R
excetuar/R
excretar/R
exercer/R
exonerar/R
expatriar/R
expirar/R
exportar/R
expulsar/R
extenuar/R
extirpar/R
extraviar/R
exumar/R
faiscar/R
falsificar/R
fanfarronar/R
fartar/R
fatorar/R
fecundar/R
fertilizar/R
ficar/R
filiar/R
finalizar/R
fintar/R
fitar/R
flamejar/R
florescer/R
fofocar/R
forjar/R
formigar/R
forragear/R
forçar/R
fracassar/R
fraturar/R
fresar/R
fritar/R
fulminar/R
fundamentar/R
furtar/R
fuçar/R
galgar/R
gangrenar/R
gargalhar/R
gastar/R
gerenciar/R
girar/R
gostar/R
gracejar/R
gratificar/R
grifar/R
grulhar/R
guilhotinar/R
habituar/R
hibernar/R
historiar/R
horripilar/R
hostilizar/R
identificar/R
iluminar/R
imbecilizar/R
imolar/R
impetrar/R
implorar/R
impostar/R
impronunciar/R
imputar/R
inaugurar/R
incidir/R
incompatibilizar/R
incriminar/R
inculpar/R
indexar/R
individualizar/R
inexistir/R
infestar/R
inflar/R
ingressar/R
injuriar/R
inquietar/R
inspecionar/R
instaurar/R
instrumentar/R
integrar/R
intercalar/R
interiorizar/R
interpretar/R
intimidar/R
intumescer/R
invejar/R
invocar/R
irradiar/R
isolar/R
jejuar/R
jubilar/R
jurar/R
lacrar/R
laicizar/R
lanchar/R
lascar/R
lavrar/R
legar/R
lembrar/R
levitar/R
licenciar/R
ligar/R
linchar/R
litigar/R
locar/R
lubrificar/R
lutar/R
madurar/R
malbaratar/R
mamar/R
manejar/R
manjar/R
maquilar/R
marchar/R
martelar/R
mascarar/R
matar/R
maximizar/R
meditar/R
melindrar/R
menosprezar/R
merecer/R
meter/R
militar/GMOR
minimizar/R
mistificar/R
mobiliar/R
modernizar/R
molestar/R
montar/R
mostrar/R
mudar/R
municiar/R
musicar/R
namorar/R
nascer/R
necessitar/R
neutralizar/R
nivelar/R
notabilizar/R
novar/R
obedecer/R
obrar/R
obsequiar/R
obstinar/R
ocorrer/R
ofertar/R
olhar/R
operacionalizar/R
orar/R
orgulhar/R
ornamentar/R
ortonormalizar/R
oscular/R
outorgar/R
pactuar/R
pagar/R
palitar/R
paparicar/R
paramentar/R
parecer/R
partilhar/R
pastar/R
patrocinar/R
pecar/R
peidar/R
penalizar/R
penetrar/R
perambular/R
perdurar/R
perfilhar/R
permanecer/R
perpetrar/R
personalizar/R
pesar/R
peticionar/R
picar/R
pigmentar/R
pincelar/R
piorar/R
plagiar/R
plasmar/R
podar/R
policiar/R
ponderar/R
porfiar/R
posicionar/R
postular/R
praguejar/R
precisar/R
predominar/R
prefixar/R
prensar/R
preponderar/R
pressionar/R
prevalecer/R
principiar/R
privilegiar/R
procriar/R
professar/R
projetar/R
promanar/R
prontificar/R
propiciar/R
prorrogar/R
prostrar/R
protocolar/R
provocar/R
pular/R
purgar/R
quadruplicar/R
quedar/R
quintuplicar/R
ramificar/R
reabastecer/R
reaparecer/R
recalcar/R
reclassificar/R
reconhecer/R
recrudescer/R
reespecificar/R
reforçar/R
reger/R
reiterar/R
religar/R
remontar/R
renegar/R
replicar/R
resmungar/R
ressoar/R
retocar/R
retraçar/R
revogar/R
roncar/R
sacar/R
salpicar/R
segregar/R
soar/R
soerguer/R
solidificar/R
subjugar/R
subutilizar/R
sulcar/R
suscitar/R
tecer/R
tocar/R
trafegar/R
transfigurar/R
trançar/R
trespassar/R
tropeçar/R
ultrapassar/R
vagar/R
vincar/R
vivificar/R
zangar/R
